Illinois, session 104th, HB3280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB3280- 2 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   HB3280- 3 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB3280- 4 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   HB3280- 5 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB3280- 6 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB3280- 7 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   HB3280- 8 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB3280- 9 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB3280- 10 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB3280- 11 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   HB3280- 12 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   HB3280- 13 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   HB3280- 14 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB3280- 15 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   HB3280- 16 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   HB3280- 17 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB3280- 18 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB3280- 19 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   HB3280- 20 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   HB3280- 21 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   HB3280- 22 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   HB3280- 23 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   HB3280- 24 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   HB3280- 25 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   HB3280- 26 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   HB3280- 27 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB3280- 28 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB3280- 29 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB3280- 30 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   HB3280- 31 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   HB3280- 32 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, the full amount of union dues paid by 21        the taxpayer during the taxable year if the taxpayer 22        was not allowed a federal deduction by operation of 23        Section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code; if any amount 24        of union dues representing federal miscellaneous 25        itemized deductions was allowed, then the amount 26        allowed as a deduction under this subparagraph (NN)   HB3280- 33 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        shall be a percentage of the union dues disallowed by 2        the operation of Section 67 of the Internal Revenue 3        Code computed as follows: by multiplying the total 4        union dues paid by the taxpayer during the taxable 5        year by a percentage determined by subtracting from 6        one a fraction where the numerator is the amount of 7        federal miscellaneous deductions allowed and the 8        denominator is the aggregate federal miscellaneous 9        itemized deductions before application of the 2% floor 10        under Section 67 of the Internal Revenue Code. In no 11        event may a deduction under this subparagraph exceed 12        (i) $60 for any individual taxpayer in any taxable 13        year or (ii) $100 in any taxable year for spouses 14        filing a joint return. For the purposes of this 15        subparagraph (NN), union dues are those amounts that 16        are deductible as union dues and agency shop fees 17        under Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 18        subparagraph (NN) is exempt from the provisions of 19        Section 250.  20    (b) Corporations.21        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 22    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 23    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).24        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 25    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum   HB3280- 34 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1    of the following amounts:2            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 3        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 4        received from regulated investment companies during 5        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 6        income in the computation of taxable income;7            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 8        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 9        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 10        year;11            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 12        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 13        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 14        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 15        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 16        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 17        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 18        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 19        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 20        law and is not a new enactment);21            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 22        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 23        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 24        ending prior to December 31, 1986;25            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 26        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year   HB3280- 35 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 2        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 3        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 4        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 5        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 6        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 7        year, with the following limitations applied in the 8        order that they are listed:9                (i) the addition modification relating to the 10            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 11            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 12            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 13            of addition modification under this subparagraph 14            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 15            which was taken into account in calculating the 16            base income of an earlier taxable year, and17                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 18            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 19            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 20            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 21            such carryback or carryforward;22            For taxable years in which there is a net 23        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 24        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 25        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 26        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts   HB3280- 36 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        computed independently under the preceding provisions 2        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;3            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB3280- 37 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 26        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts   HB3280- 38 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 3        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 4        accrued, or incurred. 5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB3280- 39 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB3280- 40 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 21        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 22        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 23        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 24        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same   HB3280- 41 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB3280- 42 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB3280- 43 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB3280- 44 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 7        Act; 8            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 9        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 10        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 11        to a real estate investment trust under Section 12        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 13        dividends paid;14            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 15        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 16        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 17        Act;18            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 20        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 21        for the taxable year; 22            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 23        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 24        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 25        Code for the taxable year; 26            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June   HB3280- 45 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 2        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 3        Code for the taxable year; 4            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 5        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 6        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 7        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 8            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 9        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 10        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 11        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 12        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 13        Tax Credit Act; 14    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 15    following amounts:16            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 17        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 18        and included in such total for the taxable year;19            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 20        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;21            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 22        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 23        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 24        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 25        for the taxable year;26            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted   HB3280- 46 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 2        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 3        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 4        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 5        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 6        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 7        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 8        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 9        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 10        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 11        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 12        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 13        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 14        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 15        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 16        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 17        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 18        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 19        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 20        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 21        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 22        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 23        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 24        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 25        from the provisions of Section 250;26            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB3280- 47 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 10        such total which were paid by a corporation which 11        conducts business operations in a River Edge 12        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 13        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 14        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 15        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 16        the provisions of Section 250;17            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 18        such total that were paid by a corporation that 19        conducts business operations in a federally designated 20        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 21        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 22        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 23        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 24        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 25        this subparagraph (L);26            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial   HB3280- 48 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 2        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 3        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 4        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 5        property which is eligible for the River Edge 6        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 7        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 8        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 9        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 10        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 11        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 12        investment credit property which secures the loan or 13        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 14        such property on the date that it was placed in service 15        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 16        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 17        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 18        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 19        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 20        calculated under the previous sentence. This 21        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 24        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 25        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 26        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a   HB3280- 49 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 2        property which is eligible for the High Impact 3        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 4        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 5        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 6        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 7        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 8        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 9        investment credit property which secures the loan or 10        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 11        such property on the date that it was placed in service 12        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 13        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 14        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 15        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 16        eligible for the deduction provided under this 17        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 18        available to taxpayers in any year under this 19        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 20        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 21        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 22        under the previous sentence;23            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 24        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 25        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 26        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of   HB3280- 50 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 2        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 3        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 4        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 5        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 6        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 7        provisions of Section 250;8            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 9        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 10        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 11        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 12        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 13        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 14        income and received from a corporation that is not 15        created or organized under the laws of the United 16        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 17        including, for taxable years ending on or after 18        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 19        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 20        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 21        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 22        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 23        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 24        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 25        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 26        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends,   HB3280- 51 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        included in taxable income and received, including, 2        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 3        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 4        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 5        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 6        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 7        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 8        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 9        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 10        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 11        affiliated group which includes the dividend 12        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 13        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 14        this subsection (b) which is related to such 15        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 16        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 17        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 18        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 19        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 20        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 21        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 22        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250 of this Act;24            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 25        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 26        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;  HB3280- 52 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 2        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 3        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 4        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 5        the Internal Revenue Code;6            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 7        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 8        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 9        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 10        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 11        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 12        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 13        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 14        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 15        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 16        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 17        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 18        Section 250;19            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 20        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 21        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 22        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 23        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 24        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 25        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 26        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal   HB3280- 53 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 2        provisions of Section 250;3            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 4        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 5        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 6        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 7        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 8        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:9                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 10            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 11            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 12            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 13            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 14            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 15            including the bonus depreciation deduction;16                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 17            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 18            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 19            0.429); and20                (3) for taxable years ending after December 21            31, 2005:22                    (i) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 25                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 26                by 0.429);  HB3280- 54 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                1.0;5                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 7                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 8                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 9                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 10                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 11                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 12                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 13                depreciation on that property; and14                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 16                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 17                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 18                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 19                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 20                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 21                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 22                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 23                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 24            The aggregate amount deducted under this 25        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 26        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus   HB3280- 55 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 2        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 3        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 4        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250;6            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 7        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 8        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 9        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 10        equal to that addition modification.11            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 12        the last day of the last tax year for which a 13        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 14        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 15        required in any taxable year to make an addition 16        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 17        equal to that addition modification. 18            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 19        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 20        one piece of property.21            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 22        provisions of Section 250;23            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 24        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 25        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 26        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition   HB3280- 56 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        modification with respect to such transaction under 2        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 3        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 4        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 5        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 6        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 7        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 8        that is required to make an addition modification with 9        respect to such transaction under Section 10        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 11        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 12        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 13        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 14        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 15        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 16        an addition modification with respect to such 17        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 18        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 19        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 20        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 21        from the provisions of Section 250; 22            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 23        into account for the taxable year (net of the 24        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 25        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 26        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but   HB3280- 57 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        for the fact that the foreign person's business 2        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 3        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 4        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 5        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 6        business group but for the fact that the person is 7        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 8        included in the unitary business group because he or 9        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 10        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 11        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 12        made for the same taxable year under Section 13        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 14        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 15        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 16        Section 250; 17            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 18        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 19        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 20        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 21        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 22        for the fact that the foreign person's business 23        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 24        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 25        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 26        a person who would be a member of the same unitary   HB3280- 58 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        business group but for the fact that the person is 2        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 3        included in the unitary business group because he or 4        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 5        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 6        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 7        made for the same taxable year under Section 8        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 9        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 10        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 11        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 12            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 13        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 14        add back any insurance premiums under Section 15        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 16        that part of a reimbursement received from the 17        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 18        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 19        company) that would have been taken into account as a 20        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 21        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 22        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 23        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 24        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 25        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 26        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of   HB3280- 59 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Section 250; 2            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 3        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 4        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 5        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 6        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 7        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 8        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 9        provisions of Section 250; and 10            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 11        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 12        operating in this State and licensed under the 13        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 14        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 15        organization operating in this State and licensed 16        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 17        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 18        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 19        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 20        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 21        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 22        of Section 250. 23        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 24    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 25    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 26    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross   HB3280- 60 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 2    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 3    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 4    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 5    (c) Trusts and estates.6        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 7    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 8    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).9        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 10    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 11    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 14        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 15        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 16        in the computation of taxable income;17            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 18        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 19        required to distribute all of its income currently, 20        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 21        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 22        the computation of taxable income;23            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 24        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 25        the computation of taxable income for the taxable   HB3280- 61 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        year;2            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 3        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 4        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 5        ending prior to December 31, 1986;6            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 7        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 8        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 9        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 10        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 11        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 12        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 13        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 14        the following limitations applied in the order that 15        they are listed:16                (i) the addition modification relating to the 17            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 18            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 19            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 20            of addition modification under this subparagraph 21            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 22            which was taken into account in calculating the 23            base income of an earlier taxable year, and24                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 25            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 26            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to   HB3280- 62 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 2            such carryback or carryforward;3            For taxable years in which there is a net 4        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 5        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 6        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 7        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 8        computed independently under the preceding provisions 9        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;10            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 11        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 12        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 13        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 14        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 15        of this Act;16            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of taxable income;20            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 21        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 22        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 23        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 24        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 25        201;26            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an   HB3280- 63 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 2        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 3        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 4        the Internal Revenue Code; and5            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 6        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 7        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 8        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 9        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 10        deductions taken in all taxable years under 11        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.12            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 13        the last day of the last tax year for which a 14        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 15        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 16        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 17        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 18        equal to that subtraction modification. 19            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 20        modification under this subparagraph only once with 21        respect to any one piece of property;22            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 23        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 24        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a   HB3280- 64 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        member of the same unitary business group but for the 2        fact that the foreign person's business activity 3        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 4        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 5        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 6        who would be a member of the same unitary business 7        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 8        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 9        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 10        required to apportion business income under different 11        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 12        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 13        extent that dividends were included in base income of 14        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 15        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 16        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 17        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 18        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 19        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 21        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 22        accrued, or incurred. 23            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 24                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 25            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 26            is subject in a foreign country or state, other   HB3280- 65 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 2            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 3            with respect to such interest; or4                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 5            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 6            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 7            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 8            following:9                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 10                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 11                to a person that is not a related member, and12                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 13                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 14                person did not have as a principal purpose the 15                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 16                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 17                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 18                terms; or 19                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 20            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 21            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 22            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 23            and terms and the principal purpose for the 24            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 25            or 26                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or   HB3280- 66 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 2            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 3            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 4            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 5            to the application or use of an alternative method 6            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 7                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 8            Director from making any other adjustment 9            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 10            for any tax year beginning after the effective 11            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 12            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 13            Department and such regulations provide methods 14            and standards by which the Department will utilize 15            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 16            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 17        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 18        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 19        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 20        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 21        foreign person who would be a member of the same 22        unitary business group but for the fact that the 23        foreign person's business activity outside the United 24        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 25        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of   HB3280- 67 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 2        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 3        from being included in the unitary business group 4        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 5        business income under different subsections of Section 6        304. The addition modification required by this 7        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 8        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 9        group for the same taxable year and received by the 10        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 11        business group (including amounts included in gross 12        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 13        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 14        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 15        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 16        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 17        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 18        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 19        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 20        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 21        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 22        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 23        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 24        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 25        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 26        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses   HB3280- 68 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 2        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 3        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 4        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 5        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 6        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 7        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 8        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.9            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:10                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 11            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 13            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 14            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 15            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 16            with respect to such item; or17                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 18            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 20            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 21            following:22                    (a) the person during the same taxable 23                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 24                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 25                not a related member, and26                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the   HB3280- 69 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                intangible expense or cost between the 2                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 3                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 4                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 5                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 6                or7                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 8            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 12            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 13            writing to the application or use of an 14            alternative method of apportionment under Section 15            304(f); 16                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 17            Director from making any other adjustment 18            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 19            for any tax year beginning after the effective 20            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 21            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 22            Department and such regulations provide methods 23            and standards by which the Department will utilize 24            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 25            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of   HB3280- 70 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 2        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 3        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 4        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 5        business group but for the fact that the person is 6        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 7        included in the unitary business group because he or 8        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 9        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 10        addition modification required by this subparagraph 11        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 12        included in base income of the unitary group for the 13        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 14        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 15        (including amounts included in gross income under 16        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 17        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 18        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 19        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 20        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 21        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 22        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 23        the addition modification required under Section 24        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 25        Act;26            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB3280- 71 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 9        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 10        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 11        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 12        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 13        Tax Credit Act; 14    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 15    following amounts:16            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 17        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 18        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 19        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 20        as distributions under the provisions of any 21        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 22        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 23        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 24        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 25        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 26        adopted pursuant thereto;  HB3280- 72 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (I) The valuation limitation amount;2            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 3        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 4        and included in such total for the taxable year;5            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 6        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 7        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 8        taxation by this State either by reason of its 9        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 10        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 11        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 12        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 13        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 14        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 15        premium amortization;16            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 17        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 18        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 19        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 20        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 21        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 22        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 23        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 24        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 26        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section   HB3280- 73 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 3        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 5        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 6        250;7            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 8        such total which were paid by a corporation which 9        conducts business operations in a River Edge 10        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 11        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 12        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 13        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 14        the provisions of Section 250;15            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 16        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 17        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;18            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 19        such total that were paid by a corporation that 20        conducts business operations in a federally designated 21        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 22        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 23        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 24        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 25        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 26        this subparagraph (O);  HB3280- 74 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 2        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 3        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 4        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 5        the Internal Revenue Code;6            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 7        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 8        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 9        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 10        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 11        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 12        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 13        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 14        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 15        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 16        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 17        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 18        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 19        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 20        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 21        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 22        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 23        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 24        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 25        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 26        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets   HB3280- 75 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 2        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 3        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 4        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 5        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 6        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 7        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 8        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 9        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 10        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 11        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 12        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;13            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 14        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 15        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 16        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 17        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 18        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:19                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 20            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 21            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 22            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 23            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 24            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 25            including the bonus depreciation deduction;26                (2) for taxable years ending on or before   HB3280- 76 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 2            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 3            0.429); and4                (3) for taxable years ending after December 5            31, 2005:6                    (i) for property on which a bonus 7                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 8                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 9                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 10                by 0.429);11                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 14                1.0;15                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 16                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 17                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 18                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 19                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 20                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 21                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 22                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 23                depreciation on that property; and24                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 25                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 26                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis   HB3280- 77 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 2                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 3                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 4                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 5                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 6                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 7                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 8            The aggregate amount deducted under this 9        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 10        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 11        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 12        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 13        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 14        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 15        Section 250;16            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 17        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 18        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification.21            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 22        the last day of the last tax year for which a 23        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 24        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 25        required in any taxable year to make an addition 26        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount   HB3280- 78 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        equal to that addition modification. 2            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 3        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 4        one piece of property.5            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 6        provisions of Section 250;7            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 8        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 9        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 10        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 11        modification with respect to such transaction under 12        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 13        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 14        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 15        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 16        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 17        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 18        that is required to make an addition modification with 19        respect to such transaction under Section 20        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 21        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 22        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 23        from the provisions of Section 250; 24            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 25        into account for the taxable year (net of the 26        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to   HB3280- 79 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 2        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 3        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 4        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 5        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 6        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 7        who would be a member of the same unitary business 8        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 9        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 10        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 11        required to apportion business income under different 12        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 13        addition modification required to be made for the same 14        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 15        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 16        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 17        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 18            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 19        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 20        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 21        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 23        for the fact that the foreign person's business 24        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 25        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 26        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to   HB3280- 80 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 2        business group but for the fact that the person is 3        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 4        included in the unitary business group because he or 5        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 6        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 7        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 8        made for the same taxable year under Section 9        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 10        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 11        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 12        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 13            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 14        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 15        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 16        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 17        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 18        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 19        from Section 250; 20            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 21        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 22        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 23        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 24        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;25            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 26        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to   HB3280- 81 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        add back any insurance premiums under Section 2        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 3        that part of a reimbursement received from the 4        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 5        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 6        company) that would have been taken into account as a 7        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 8        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 9        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 10        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 11        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 12        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 13        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 14        Section 250;15            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 16        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 17        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 18        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 19        Revenue Code; and 20            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 21        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 22        operating in this State and licensed under the 23        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 24        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 25        organization operating in this State and licensed 26        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis   HB3280- 82 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 2        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 3        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 4        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 5        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 6        of Section 250. 7        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 8    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 9    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 10    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 11    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 12    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 13    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 14    (d) Partnerships.15        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 16    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 17    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).18        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 19    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 20    of the following amounts:21            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 22        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 23        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 24        in the computation of taxable income;25            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB3280- 83 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 2        the taxable year;3            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 4        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 5        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 6        income;7            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 8        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 9        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 10        computation of taxable income;11            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 12        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 13        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 14        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 15        the Internal Revenue Code;16            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 17        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 18        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 19        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 20        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 21        deductions taken in all taxable years under 22        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.23            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 24        the last day of the last tax year for which a 25        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 26        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was   HB3280- 84 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 2        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 3        equal to that subtraction modification. 4            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 5        modification under this subparagraph only once with 6        respect to any one piece of property;7            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 8        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 9        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 10        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 11        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 12        member of the same unitary business group but for the 13        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 14        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 15        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 16        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 17        who would be a member of the same unitary business 18        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 19        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 20        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 21        required to apportion business income under different 22        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 23        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 24        extent that dividends were included in base income of 25        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 26        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the   HB3280- 85 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 2        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 3        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 4        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 5        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 6        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 7        accrued, or incurred. 8            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 9                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 10            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 11            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 12            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 13            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 14            with respect to such interest; or15                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 16            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 17            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 18            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 19            following:20                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 21                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 22                to a person that is not a related member, and23                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 24                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 25                person did not have as a principal purpose the 26                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid   HB3280- 86 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 2                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 3                terms; or 4                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 5            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 6            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 7            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 8            and terms and the principal purpose for the 9            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 10            or 11                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 13            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 14            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 15            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 16            to the application or use of an alternative method 17            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 18                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 19            Director from making any other adjustment 20            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 21            for any tax year beginning after the effective 22            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 23            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 24            Department and such regulations provide methods 25            and standards by which the Department will utilize 26            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and   HB3280- 87 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 2        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 3        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 4        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 5        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 6        foreign person who would be a member of the same 7        unitary business group but for the fact that the 8        foreign person's business activity outside the United 9        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 10        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 11        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 12        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 13        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 14        from being included in the unitary business group 15        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 16        business income under different subsections of Section 17        304. The addition modification required by this 18        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 19        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 20        group for the same taxable year and received by the 21        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 22        business group (including amounts included in gross 23        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 24        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 25        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 26        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom   HB3280- 88 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 2        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 3        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 4        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 5        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 6        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 7        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 8        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 9        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 10        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 11        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 12        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 13        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 14        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 15        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 16        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 17        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 18        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 19        similar types of intangible assets;20            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:21                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 22            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 23            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 24            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 25            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 26            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income   HB3280- 89 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            with respect to such item; or2                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 3            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 4            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 5            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 6            following:7                    (a) the person during the same taxable 8                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 9                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 10                not a related member, and11                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 12                intangible expense or cost between the 13                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 14                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 15                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 16                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 17                or18                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 21            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 22            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 23            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 24            writing to the application or use of an 25            alternative method of apportionment under Section 26            304(f);   HB3280- 90 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 2            Director from making any other adjustment 3            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 4            for any tax year beginning after the effective 5            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 6            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 7            Department and such regulations provide methods 8            and standards by which the Department will utilize 9            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 10            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 11        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 12        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 13        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 14        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 15        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 16        business group but for the fact that the person is 17        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 18        included in the unitary business group because he or 19        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 20        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 21        addition modification required by this subparagraph 22        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 23        included in base income of the unitary group for the 24        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 25        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 26        (including amounts included in gross income under   HB3280- 91 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 2        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 3        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 4        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 5        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 6        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 7        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 8        the addition modification required under Section 9        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;10            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 11        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 12        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 13        Act;14            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 15        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 16        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 17        for the taxable year; 18            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 19        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 20        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 21        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 22        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 23        Tax Credit Act; 24    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 25    amounts:26            (E) The valuation limitation amount;  HB3280- 92 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 2        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 3        and included in such total for the taxable year;4            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 5        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 6        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 7        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 8        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 9        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 10        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 11        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 12        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 13        net of bond premium amortization;14            (H) Any income of the partnership which 15        constitutes personal service income as defined in 16        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 17        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 18        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 19        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 20        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 21        Section 250;22            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 23        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 24        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 25        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 26        including amounts distributable to organizations   HB3280- 93 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 2        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 3        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;4            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 5        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 6        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 7        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 8        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 9        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 10        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 11        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 12        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 13        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 14        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 15        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 16        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 17        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 18        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 19        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 20        250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total which were paid by a corporation which 23        conducts business operations in a River Edge 24        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 25        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 26        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment   HB3280- 94 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 2        the provisions of Section 250;3            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 4        job training project established pursuant to the Real 5        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;6            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 7        such total that were paid by a corporation that 8        conducts business operations in a federally designated 9        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 10        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 11        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 12        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 13        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 14        this subparagraph (M);15            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 16        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 17        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 18        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 19        the Internal Revenue Code;20            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 21        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 22        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 23        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 24        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 25        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:26                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation   HB3280- 95 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 2            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 3            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 4            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 5            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 6            including the bonus depreciation deduction;7                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 8            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 9            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 10            0.429); and11                (3) for taxable years ending after December 12            31, 2005:13                    (i) for property on which a bonus 14                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 15                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 16                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 17                by 0.429);18                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 20                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 21                1.0;22                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 25                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 26                depreciation deduction that would be allowed   HB3280- 96 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 2                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 3                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 4                depreciation on that property; and5                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 7                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 8                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 9                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 10                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 11                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 12                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 13                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 14                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 15            The aggregate amount deducted under this 16        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 17        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 18        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 19        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 20        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 21        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 24        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 25        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 26        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount   HB3280- 97 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        equal to that addition modification.2            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 3        the last day of the last tax year for which a 4        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 5        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 6        required in any taxable year to make an addition 7        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 8        equal to that addition modification. 9            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 10        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 11        one piece of property.12            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 13        provisions of Section 250;14            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 15        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 16        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 17        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 18        modification with respect to such transaction under 19        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 20        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 21        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 22        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 23        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 24        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 25        that is required to make an addition modification with 26        respect to such transaction under Section   HB3280- 98 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 2        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 3        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 4        from Section 250; 5            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 6        into account for the taxable year (net of the 7        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 8        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 10        for the fact that the foreign person's business 11        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 12        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 13        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 14        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 15        business group but for the fact that the person is 16        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 17        included in the unitary business group because he or 18        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 19        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 20        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 21        made for the same taxable year under Section 22        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 23        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 24        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 25            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 26        property taken into account for the taxable year (net   HB3280- 99 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 2        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 4        for the fact that the foreign person's business 5        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 6        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 8        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 9        business group but for the fact that the person is 10        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 11        included in the unitary business group because he or 12        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 13        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 14        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 15        made for the same taxable year under Section 16        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 17        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 18        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 19        Section 250; 20            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 21        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 22        add back any insurance premiums under Section 23        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 24        that part of a reimbursement received from the 25        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 26        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance   HB3280- 100 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        company) that would have been taken into account as a 2        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 3        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 4        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 5        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 6        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 7        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 8        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 9        Section 250; and 10            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 11        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 12        operating in this State and licensed under the 13        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 14        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 15        organization operating in this State and licensed 16        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 17        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 18        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 19        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 20        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 21        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 22        of Section 250.  23    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.24        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 25    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section   HB3280- 101 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 2    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 3    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 4    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 5    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 6    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 7    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 8    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 9    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 10    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 11    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 12    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 13    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 14    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 15    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 16    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 17    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 18    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 19    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 20    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 21    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 22    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 23    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 24    addition modification must be made under those 25    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 26    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is   HB3280- 102 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 2    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 3    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 4    Internal Revenue Code.5        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 6    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 7    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:8            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 9        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 10        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 11        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 12        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 13        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 14        Internal Revenue Code;15            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 16        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 17        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 18        insurance company taxable income;19            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 20        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 21        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 22        investment company taxable income;23            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 24        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 25        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26        real estate investment trust taxable income;  HB3280- 103 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 2        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 3        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 4        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 5        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 6        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 7        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 8        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 9        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 10        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 11        determined as if the election provided by Section 12        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 13        effect for all such years;14            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 15        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 16        organization determined in accordance with the 17        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 19        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 20        activities against income from nonpatronage 21        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 22        association may make an election to follow its federal 23        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 24        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 25        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 26        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section   HB3280- 104 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 2        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 3        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 4        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 5        effective for all taxable years with original returns 6        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 7        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 8        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 9        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 10        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 11        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 12        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 13        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 14        requirements for documenting the elections and any 15        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 16        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 17        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 18        existing law; 19            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 20        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 21        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 22        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 23        of such corporation determined in accordance with 24        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 25        that taxable income shall take into account those 26        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the   HB3280- 105 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 2        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 3        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 4        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 5        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 6        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 7        such corporation determined in accordance with the 8        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 9        1982; and10            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 11        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 12        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 13        income shall take into account those items which are 14        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 15        but which would be taken into account by an individual 16        in calculating his taxable income.17        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 18    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 19    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 20    business has been classified as business income and in a 21    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 22    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 23    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 24    related to that asset or business that generated the 25    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 26    business income in the year of the disposition of the   HB3280- 106 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 2    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 3    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 4    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 5    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 6    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 7    preceding taxable years.  8    (f) Valuation limitation amount.9        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 10    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 11    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:12            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 13        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 14        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 15        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 16        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 17        plus18            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 19        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 20        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 21        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 22        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 23        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 24        of such gain included in the amount determined under 25        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).  HB3280- 107 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.2            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 3        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 4        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 5        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 6        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 7        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 8        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 9        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 10        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 11        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 12        such property.13            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 14        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 15        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 16        amount for such property is that amount which bears 17        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 18        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 19        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 20        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 21        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 22        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 23        period for the property.24            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 25        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 26        purposes of this paragraph.   HB3280- 108 -LRB104 11474 HLH 21563 b1    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 2otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 3to be deducted more than once. 4    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 5this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 6the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 7account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 8taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 9year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 10computation of base income and net income under this Act for 11such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 12August 1, 1969 or otherwise.13(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 14102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 1512-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 16Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 17Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 18eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.